Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.110

Clerk of board.

The county auditor shall be the clerk of the board of county commissioners unless the board of county commissioners designates one of its employees to serve as clerk who shall attend its meetings and keep a record of its proceedings.

[ 1981 c 240 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.110. Prior: Code 1881 s 2668; 1869 p 304 s 6; 1867 p 53 s 6; 1863 p 541 s 6; 1854 p 420 s 6; RRS s 4052.]